California statutes. Corporations Code
(3) The manner of converting the membership interests of each of the constituent limited liability companies into interests, shares, or other securities of the surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity, and if limited liability company interests of any of the constituent limited liability companies are not to be converted solely into interests, shares, or other securities of the surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity, the cash, property, rights, interests, or securities that the holders of the limited liability company interests are to receive in exchange for the membership interests, the cash, property, rights, interests, or securities that may be in addition to or in lieu of interests, shares, or other securities of the
 surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity, or that the limited liability company interests are canceled without consideration.

(4) The amendments to the articles of organization of the surviving limited liability company, if applicable, to be effected by the merger, if any.

(5) Any other details or provisions that are required by the laws under which any constituent other business entity is organized, including, if a domestic corporation is a party to the merger, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 1113.

(6) Any other details or provisions that are desired, including, without limitation, a provision for the treatment of fractional membership interests.

(b) (1) Each membership interest of the same
 class of any constituent limited liability company, other than a membership interest in another constituent limited liability company that is being canceled and that is held by a constituent limited liability company or its parent or a limited liability company of which the constituent limited liability company is a parent shall, unless all members of the class consent, be treated equally with respect to any distribution of cash, property, rights, interests, or securities.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), except in a merger of a limited liability company with a limited liability company that controls at least 90 percent of the membership interests entitled to vote with respect to the merger, the unredeemable membership interests of a constituent limited liability company may be converted only into unredeemable interests or securities of the surviving limited liability company or other business entity, or a parent if a constituent limited
 liability company or a constituent other business entity or its parent owns, directly or indirectly, prior to the merger, membership interests of another constituent limited liability company or interests or securities of a constituent other business entity representing more than 50 percent of the interests or securities entitled to vote with respect to the merger of the other constituent limited liability company or constituent other business entity or more than 50 percent of the voting power, as defined in Section 194.5, of a constituent other business entity that is a domestic corporation, unless all of the members of the class consent.

(3) The provisions of this subdivision do not apply to any transaction if the commissioner has approved the terms and conditions of the transaction and the fairness of those terms pursuant to Section 25142.

(c) Notwithstanding its prior
 approval, an agreement of merger may be amended prior to the filing of the certificate of merger or the agreement of merger, as provided in Section 17710.14, if the amendment is approved by the managers and members of each constituent limited liability company in the same manner as required for approval of the original agreement of merger and, if the amendment changes any of the principal terms of the agreement of merger, the amendment is approved by the managers and members of each constituent limited liability company in the same manner and to the same extent as required for the approval of the original agreement of merger, and by each of the constituent other business entities.

(d) The managers and members of a constituent limited liability company may, in their discretion, abandon a merger, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties, including other constituent limited liability companies and constituent other business
 entities, without further approval by the membership interests, at any time before the merger is effective.

(e) An agreement of merger approved in accordance with subdivision (a) may do the following:

(1) Effect any amendment to the operating agreement of any constituent limited liability company.

(2) Effect the adoption of a new operating agreement for a constituent limited liability company if it is the surviving limited liability company in the merger. Any amendment to an operating agreement or adoption of a new operating agreement made pursuant to the foregoing sentence shall be effective at the effective time or date of the merger. Notwithstanding the above provisions of this subdivision, if a greater number of members is required to approve an amendment to the operating agreement of a constituent limited
 liability company than is required to approve the agreement of merger pursuant to subdivision (a), and the number of members that approve the agreement of merger is less than the number of members required to approve an amendment to the operating agreement of the constituent limited liability company, any amendment to the operating agreement or adoption of a new operating agreement of that constituent limited liability company made pursuant to the first sentence of this subdivision shall be effective only if the agreement of merger provides that all of the members shall have the dissenters’ rights provided in Article 11 (commencing with Section 17711.01).

(f) The surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity shall keep the agreement of merger at its designated office or at the business address specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 17710.14, as applicable, and, upon the request of a member of a
 constituent limited liability company or a holder of shares, interests, or other securities of a constituent other business entity, the managers or members of the surviving limited liability company or the authorized person of the surviving other business entity shall promptly deliver to the member or the holder of shares, interests, or other securities, at the expense of the surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity, a copy of the agreement of merger. A waiver by a member or holder of shares, interests, or other securities of the rights provided in this subdivision shall be unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 775, Sec. 20.   (AB 506)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.13.

Subdivision (b) of Section 17710.12 shall not apply to any transaction if the commissioner has approved the terms and conditions of the transaction and the fairness of such terms and conditions pursuant to Section 25142.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.14.

(a) If the surviving entity is a limited liability company or an other business entity, other than a corporation in a merger in which a domestic corporation is a constituent party, after approval of a merger by the constituent limited liability companies and any constituent other business entities, the constituent limited liability companies and constituent other business entities shall file a certificate of merger in the office of, and on a form prescribed by, the Secretary of State. The certificate of merger shall be executed and acknowledged by each domestic constituent limited liability company by all managers, or if none, all members unless a lesser number is provided in the articles of organization or operating agreement of the domestic constituent limited liability company and
 by each foreign constituent limited liability company by one or more managers, or if none, members, and by each constituent other business entity by those persons required to execute the certificate of merger by the laws under which the constituent other business entity is organized. The certificate of merger shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The names and the Secretary of State’s file numbers, if any, of each of the constituent limited liability companies and constituent other business entities, separately identifying the disappearing limited liability companies and disappearing other business entities and the surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity.

(2) If a vote of the members was required pursuant to Section 17710.12, a statement setting forth the total number of outstanding interests of each class entitled to vote on the merger and that
 the principal terms of the agreement of merger were approved by a vote of the number of interests of each class that equaled or exceeded the vote required, specifying each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class.

(3) If the surviving entity is a limited liability company and not an other business entity, any change required to the information set forth in the articles of organization of the surviving limited liability company resulting from the merger, including any change in the name of the surviving limited liability company resulting from the merger. The filing of a certificate of merger setting forth any such changes to the articles of organization of the surviving limited liability company shall have the effect of the filing of a certificate of amendment by the surviving limited liability company, and the surviving limited liability company need not file an amendment under Section 17702.02 to reflect those
 changes.

(4) The future effective date, that shall be a date certain not more than 90 days subsequent to the date of filing of the merger, if the merger is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate of merger with the office of the Secretary of State.

(5) If the surviving entity is an other business entity or a foreign limited liability company, the full name of the entity, type of entity, legal jurisdiction where the entity was organized and by whose laws its internal affairs are governed, and the address of the principal place of business of the entity.

(6) Any other information required to be stated in the certificate of merger by the laws where each constituent other business entity is organized, including if a domestic corporation is a party to the merger, as required under paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (g) of Section 1113. If the surviving entity is a foreign limited liability company in a merger where a domestic corporation is a disappearing other business entity, a copy of the agreement of merger and attachments as required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 1113 shall be filed at the same time as the filing of the certificate of merger.

(b) If the surviving entity is a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation in a merger that a domestic corporation is a constituent party, after approval of the merger by the constituent limited liability companies and constituent other business entities, the surviving corporation shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a copy of the agreement of merger and attachments required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 1113. The certificate of merger shall be executed and acknowledged by each domestic constituent limited liability company by all of the
 managers, unless a lesser number is provided in the articles of organization of the limited liability company.

(c) A certificate of merger or the agreement of merger, as is applicable under subdivisions (a) and (b), shall have the effect of the filing of a certificate of cancellation for each disappearing limited liability company, and no disappearing limited liability company need take any action under Article 7 (commencing with Section 17707.01) concerning dissolution as a result of the merger.

(d) If a disappearing other entity is a foreign corporation qualified to transact intrastate business in this state, the filing of the certificate of merger or agreement of merger, as is applicable, by the foreign corporation shall automatically surrender its right to transact intrastate business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 47.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.15.

(a) Unless a future effective date is provided in a certificate of merger or the agreement of merger, if an agreement of merger is required to be filed under Section 17710.14, in which event the merger shall be effective at that future effective date, a merger shall be effective upon the filing of the certificate of merger or the agreement of merger, as is applicable, in the office of the Secretary of State.

(b) (1) For all purposes, a copy of the certificate of merger duly certified by the Secretary of State is conclusive evidence of the merger of the constituent limited liability companies, either by themselves or together with constituent
 other business entities, into the surviving other business entity, or the constituent limited liability companies or the constituent other business entities, or both, into the surviving limited liability company.

(2) In a merger in which the surviving entity is a corporation in a merger in which a domestic corporation and a domestic limited liability company are parties to the merger, a copy of an agreement of merger certified on or after the effective date by an official having custody thereof has the same force in evidence as the original and, except as against the state, is conclusive evidence of the performance of all conditions precedent to the merger, the existence on the effective date of the surviving corporation, and the performance of the conditions necessary to the adoption of any amendment to the articles of incorporation of the
 surviving corporation, if applicable, contained in the agreement of merger.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.16.

(a) Upon a merger of limited liability companies or limited liability companies and other business entities pursuant to this article, the separate existence of the disappearing limited liability companies and disappearing other business entities ceases and the surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity shall succeed, without other transfer, act or deed, to all the rights and property, whether real, personal, or mixed, of each of the disappearing limited liability companies and disappearing other business entities, and shall be subject to all the debts and liabilities of each in the same manner as if the surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity had itself
 incurred them.

(b) All rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of each of the constituent limited liability companies and constituent other business entities shall be preserved unimpaired and may be enforced against the surviving limited liability company or the surviving other business entity to the same extent as if the debt, liability, or duty which gave rise to that lien had been incurred or contracted by the surviving limited liability company or the surviving other business entity, provided that such liens upon the property of a disappearing limited liability company or disappearing other business entity shall be limited to the property affected thereby immediately prior to the time the merger is effective.

(c) Any action or proceeding pending by or against any disappearing
 limited liability company or disappearing other business entity may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity, or the surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity may be proceeded against or be substituted in the place of the disappearing limited liability company or disappearing other business entity.

(d) Nothing in this article is intended to affect the liability a member of a disappearing limited liability company may have in connection with the debts and liabilities of the disappearing limited liability company existing prior to the time the merger is effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.17.

(a) If the surviving entity is a domestic limited liability company or a domestic other business entity, the merger proceedings with respect to that limited liability company or other business entity and any domestic disappearing limited liability company shall conform to the provisions of this article governing the merger of domestic limited liability companies, but if the surviving entity is a foreign limited liability company or a foreign other business entity, then, subject to the requirements of subdivision (d) and Article 11 (commencing with Section 17711.01) and, with respect to any domestic constituent corporation, Section 1113, Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200), and Chapter 13 (commencing with
 Section 1300) of Division 1 of Title 1 and, with respect to any domestic constituent limited partnership, Article 11.5 (commencing with Section 15911.20) of Chapter 5.5 of Title 2, the merger proceedings may be in accordance with the laws of the state or place of organization of the surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity.

(b) If the surviving entity is a domestic limited liability company or domestic other business entity, other than a domestic corporation, the certificate of merger shall be filed as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 17710.14, and thereupon, subject to subdivision (a) of Section 17710.15, the merger shall be effective as to each domestic constituent limited liability company and domestic constituent other business entity. If the surviving entity is a domestic corporation, the agreement of
 merger with attachments shall be filed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17710.14, and thereupon, subject to subdivision (a) of Section 17710.15, the merger shall be effective as to each domestic constituent limited liability company and domestic constituent other business entity unless another effective date is provided pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 17711.01), with respect to any constituent corporation or constituent limited liability company.

(c) If the surviving entity is a foreign limited liability company or foreign other business entity, the merger shall become effective in accordance with the laws of the jurisdiction where the surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity is organized, but shall be effective as to any domestic disappearing limited liability company as of the time
 of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction upon the filing in this state of a certificate of merger or agreement of merger pursuant to Section 17710.14.

(d) If a merger described in subdivision (c) or (d) also includes a foreign disappearing limited liability company previously registered for the transaction of intrastate business in this state pursuant to Section 17708.02, the filing of the certificate of merger or agreement of merger, as is applicable under Section 17710.14, automatically has the effect of a cancellation of registration for that foreign limited liability company pursuant to Section 17708.07 without the necessity of the filing of a certificate of cancellation.

(e) The provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 17710.12 and Article 11 (commencing with Section
 17711.01) apply to the rights of the members of any of the constituent limited liability companies that are domestic limited liability companies and of any domestic limited liability company that is a parent of any foreign constituent limited liability company.

(f) If the surviving entity is a foreign limited liability company or foreign other business entity, the surviving entity shall file the following with the Secretary of State:

(1) An agreement that it may be served in this state in a proceeding for the enforcement of an obligation of any constituent entity and in a proceeding to enforce the rights of any holder of a dissenting interest or dissenting shares in a constituent domestic limited liability company or domestic other business entity.

(2) An irrevocable appointment of the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process, and an address to which process may be forwarded.

(3) An agreement that it will promptly pay the holder of any dissenting interest or dissenting share in a constituent domestic limited liability company or domestic other business entity the amount to which that person is entitled under the laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.18.

Whenever a domestic or foreign limited liability company or other business entity having any real property in this state merges with another limited liability company or other business entity pursuant to the laws of this state or of the state or place where any constituent limited liability company or constituent other business entity was organized, and the laws of the state or place of organization, including this state of any disappearing limited liability company or disappearing other business entity provide substantially that the making and filing of the agreement of merger or certificate of merger vests in the surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity all the real property of any disappearing limited liability
 company and disappearing other business entity, the filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county in this state where any of the real property of the disappearing limited liability company or disappearing other business entity is located of either of the following shall evidence record ownership in the surviving limited liability company or surviving other business entity of all interest of the disappearing limited liability company or disappearing other business entity in and to the real property located in that county in which both of the following occur:

(a) A certificate of merger certified by the Secretary of State, or other certificate prescribed by the Secretary of State.

(b) A copy of the agreement of merger or certificate of merger, certified
 by the Secretary of State or an authorized public official of the state or place pursuant to the laws of which the merger is effected.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.19.

(a) Upon a merger pursuant to this article, a surviving domestic or foreign limited liability company or other business entity shall be deemed to have assumed the liability of each disappearing domestic or foreign limited liability company or other business entity that is taxed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the following: 

(1) To prepare and file, or to cause to be prepared and filed, tax and information returns otherwise required of that disappearing entity as specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18501) of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and
 Taxation Code.

(2) To pay any tax liability determined to be due.

(b) If the surviving entity is a domestic limited liability company, domestic corporation, or registered limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability company, foreign limited liability partnership, or foreign corporation that is registered or qualified to do business in this state, the Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the merger.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------



ARTICLE 11. Dissenters’ Rights [17711.01. - 17711.14.]

17711.01.

(a) For purposes of this article, “reorganization” refers to any of the following:

(1) A conversion pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 17710.01).

(2) A merger pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 17710.01).

(3) The acquisition by one limited liability company in exchange, in whole or in part, for its membership interests, or the membership interests or equity securities of a limited liability company or other business entity that is in control of the acquiring limited liability company, of membership interests or
 equity securities of another limited liability company or other business
 entity if, immediately after the acquisition, the acquiring limited liability company has control of the other limited liability company or other business entity.

(4) The acquisition by one limited liability company in exchange, in whole or in part, for its membership interests, or the membership interests or equity securities of a limited liability company or other business entity which is in control of the acquiring limited liability company, or for its debt securities, or debt securities of a limited liability company or other business entity which is in control of the acquiring limited liability company, that are not adequately secured and that have a maturity date in excess of five years after the consummation of the acquisition, or both, of all or substantially all of the assets of another limited liability company or
 other business entity.

(b) For purposes of this article, “control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a limited liability company or other business entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17711.02.

(a) If the approval of outstanding membership interests is required for a limited liability company to participate in a reorganization, pursuant to the limited liability company agreement, or otherwise, then each member of the limited liability company holding those interests may, by complying with this article, require the limited liability company to purchase for cash, at its fair market value, the interest owned by the member in the limited liability company, if the interest is a dissenting interest as defined in subdivision (b). The fair market value shall be determined as of the day before the first announcement of the terms of the proposed reorganization, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in consequence of the proposed reorganization.

(b) As used
 in this article, “dissenting interest” means the interest of a member that satisfies all of the following conditions:

(1) Either:

(A) Was not, immediately prior to the reorganization, either (i) listed on any national securities exchange certified by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation under subdivision (o) of Section 25100, or (ii) listed on the list of OTC margin stocks issued by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, provided that in either instance the limited liability company whose outstanding interests are so listed provides, in its notice to members requesting their approval of the proposed reorganization, a summary of the provisions of this section and Sections 17711.03, 17711.04, 17711.05, and 17711.06.

(B) If the interest is of a class of interests listed as described in
 clause (i) or (ii) of subparagraph (A), demands for payment are filed with respect to 5 percent or more of the outstanding interests of that class.

(2) Was outstanding on the date for the determination of members entitled to vote on the reorganization.

(3) Either:

(A) Was not voted in favor of the reorganization.

(B) If the interest is described in clause (i) or (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), was voted against the reorganization; provided, however, that subparagraph (A) rather than this subparagraph applies in any event where the approval for the proposed reorganization is sought by written consent rather than at a meeting.

(4) The member has demanded that the interest be
 purchased by the limited liability company at its fair market value in accordance with Section 17711.03.

(5) The member has submitted the interest for endorsement, if applicable, in accordance with Section 17711.04.

(c) As used in this article, “dissenting member” means the recordholder of a dissenting interest, and includes an assignee of record of that interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 66.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17711.03.

(a) If members have a right under Section 17711.02, subject to compliance with paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 17711.02, to require the limited liability company to purchase their membership interests for cash, the limited liability company shall mail to each member a notice of the approval of the reorganization by the requisite vote or consent of the members, within 10 days after the date of the approval, accompanied by a copy of this section and Sections 17711.01, 17711.02, 17711.04, and 17711.05, a statement of the price determined by the limited liability company to represent the fair market value of its outstanding interests, and a brief description of the procedure to be followed if the member
 desires to exercise the member’s rights under those sections. The statement of price constitutes an offer by the limited liability company to purchase at the price stated any dissenting interests as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 17711.02, unless they lose their status as dissenting interests under Section 17711.11.

(b) Any member who has a right to require the limited liability company to purchase the member’s interest for cash under Section 17711.02, subject to compliance with paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 17711.02, and who desires the limited liability company to purchase that interest, shall make written demand upon the limited liability company for the purchase of that interest and the payment to the member in cash of its fair market value. The demand is not effective for any purpose unless it is
 received by the limited liability company or any transfer agent thereof (1) in the case of interests described in clause (i) or (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section
 17711.02, not later than the date of the members’ meeting to vote upon the reorganization, or (2) in any other case, within 30 days after the date on which notice of the approval of the reorganization by the requisite vote or consent of the members is mailed by the limited liability company to the members.

(c) The demand shall state the number or amount of the member’s interest in the limited liability company and shall contain a statement of what the member claims to be the fair market value of that interest on the day before the announcement of the proposed reorganization. The statement of fair market value constitutes an offer by the member to sell the interest at such price.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17711.04.

Within 30 days after the date on which notice of the approval of the outstanding interests of the limited liability company is mailed to the member pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17711.03, the member shall submit to the limited liability company at its principal office or at the office of any transfer agent thereof, if the interest is evidenced by a certificate, the member’s certificate representing the interest which the member demands that the limited liability company purchase, to be stamped or endorsed with a statement that the interest is a dissenting interest or to be exchanged for certificates of appropriate denominations so stamped or endorsed, or if the interest is not evidenced by a certificate, written notice of the number or
 amount of interest which the member demands that the limited liability company purchase. Upon subsequent transfers of the dissenting interest on the books of the limited liability company, the new certificates or other written statement issued therefor shall bear a like statement, together with the name of the original holder of the dissenting interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17711.05.

(a) If the limited liability company and the dissenting member agree that the member’s interest is a dissenting interest and agree upon the price to be paid for the dissenting interest, the dissenting member is entitled to the agreed price with interest thereon at the legal rate on judgments from the date of consummation of the reorganization. All agreements fixing the fair market value of any dissenting member’s interest as between the limited liability company and that member shall be in writing and filed in the records of the limited liability company.

(b) Subject to the provisions of Section 17711.08, payment of the fair market value for a dissenting interest shall be
 made within 30 days after the amount has been agreed to or within 30 days after any statutory or contractual conditions to the reorganization are satisfied, whichever is later, and in the case of dissenting interests evidenced by certificates of interest, subject to surrender of such certificates of interest, unless provided otherwise by agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17711.06.

(a) If the limited liability company denies that a membership interest is a dissenting interest, or the limited liability company and a dissenting member fail to agree upon the fair market value of a dissenting interest, then the member or any interested limited liability company, within six months after the date when notice of the approval of the reorganization by the requisite vote or consent of the members was mailed to the member, but not later, may file a complaint in the superior court of the proper county praying the court to determine whether the interest is a dissenting interest, or the fair market value of the dissenting interest, or both, or may intervene in any action pending on such a complaint.

(b) Two or more dissenting members may join as plaintiffs or be joined as defendants in any of those actions and two or more of those actions may be consolidated.

(c) On the trial of the action, the court shall determine the issues. If the status of the membership interest as a dissenting interest is in issue, the court shall first determine that issue. If the fair market value of the dissenting interest is in issue, the court shall determine, or shall appoint one or more impartial appraisers to determine, the fair market value of the dissenting interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17711.07.

(a) If the court appoints an appraiser or appraisers, they shall proceed forthwith to determine the fair market value per interest of the outstanding membership interests of the limited liability company, by class if necessary. Within the time fixed by the court, the appraisers, or a majority of them, shall make and file a report in the office of the clerk of the court. Thereupon, on the motion of any party, the report shall be submitted to the court and considered on such additional evidence as the court considers relevant. If the court finds the report reasonable, the court may confirm it.

(b) If a majority of the appraisers appointed fails to make and file
 a report within 30 days from the date of their appointment, or within a further time as may be allowed by the court, or the report is not confirmed by the court, the court shall determine the fair market value per interest of the outstanding membership interests of the limited liability company, by class if necessary.

(c) Subject to Section 17711.08, judgment shall be rendered against the limited liability company for payment of an amount equal to the fair market value, as determined by the court, of each dissenting interest that any dissenting member who is a party, or has intervened, is entitled to require the limited liability company to purchase, with interest thereon at the legal rate on judgments from the date of consummation of the reorganization.

(d) Any of those judgments shall
 be payable forthwith, provided, however, that with respect to membership interests evidenced by transferable certificates of interest, only upon the endorsement and delivery to the limited liability company of those certificates representing the interests described in the judgment. Any party may appeal from the judgment.

(e) The costs of the action, including reasonable compensation for the appraisers, to be fixed by the court, shall be assessed or apportioned as the court considers equitable, but, if the appraisal exceeds the price offered by the limited liability company, the limited liability company shall pay the costs, including, in the discretion of the court, if the value awarded by the court for the dissenting interest is more than 125 percent of the price offered by the limited liability company under subdivision (a) of Section 17711.02,
 attorney’s fees and fees of expert witnesses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17711.08.

To the extent that the payment to dissenting members of the fair market value of their dissenting interests would require the dissenting members to return payment or a portion of the payment by reason of Section 17711.09 or the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3439) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Civil Code), then that payment or portion thereof shall not be made and the dissenting members shall become creditors of the limited liability company for the amount not paid, together with interest thereon at the legal rate on judgments until the date of payment, but subordinate to all other creditors in any proceeding relating to the winding up and dissolution of the limited liability company, such debt to be payable when permissible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 44, Sec. 24.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17711.09.
